California statutes. Probate Code
(10) The effect of current and reasonably expected economic conditions.

(11) The
 reasonably expected tax consequences of the exercise of the power.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16326.

(a) For purposes of this section, “fiduciary decision” means any of the following:

(1) A fiduciary’s allocation between income and principal or another determination regarding income and principal required or authorized by the terms of the trust or this chapter.

(2) The fiduciary’s exercise or nonexercise of a discretionary power regarding income and principal granted by the terms of the trust or this chapter, including the power to adjust under Section 16327, convert an income trust to a unitrust under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332, change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332, or
 convert a unitrust to an income trust under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332.

(3) The fiduciary’s implementation of a decision described in paragraph (1) or (2).

(b) The court may not order a fiduciary to change a fiduciary decision unless the court determines that the fiduciary decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion.

(c) If the court determines that a fiduciary decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion, the court may order a remedy authorized by law. To place the beneficiaries in the positions the beneficiaries would have occupied if there had not been an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion, the court may order any of the following:

(1) The fiduciary to exercise or refrain from exercising the power to adjust
 under Section 16327.

(2) The fiduciary to exercise or refrain from exercising the power to convert an income trust to a unitrust under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332, change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332, or convert a unitrust to an income trust under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332.

(3) The fiduciary to distribute an amount to a beneficiary.

(4) A beneficiary to return some or all of a distribution.

(5) The fiduciary to withhold an amount from one or more future distributions to a beneficiary.

(6) Upon a petition by a fiduciary for instruction, the court may
 determine whether a proposed fiduciary decision will result in an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion. If the petition describes the proposed decision, contains sufficient information to inform the beneficiary of the reasons for making the proposed decision and the facts on which the fiduciary relies, and explains how the beneficiary will be affected by the proposed decision, a beneficiary that opposes the proposed decision has the burden to establish that it will result in an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16327.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or this section, a fiduciary, in a record, without court approval, may adjust between income and principal if the fiduciary determines the exercise of the power to adjust will assist the fiduciary in administering the trust or estate impartially.

(b) This section does not create a duty to exercise or consider the power to adjust under subdivision (a) or to inform a beneficiary about the applicability of this section.

(c) A fiduciary that in good faith exercises or fails to exercise the power to adjust under subdivision (a) is not liable to a person affected by the exercise or failure to exercise.

(d) In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust under subdivision (a), a fiduciary shall consider all factors the fiduciary considers relevant, including relevant factors in subdivision (e) of Section 16325 and the application of subdivision (i) of Section 16340 and Sections 16347 and 16352.

(e) A fiduciary may not exercise the power under subdivision (a) to make an adjustment or under Section 16347 to make a determination that an allocation is insubstantial under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The adjustment or determination would reduce the amount payable to a current income beneficiary from a trust that qualifies for a special tax benefit, except to the extent the adjustment is made to provide for a reasonable apportionment of the total return of the trust between the current
 income beneficiary and successor beneficiaries.

(2) The adjustment or determination would change the amount payable to a beneficiary, as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets, under the terms of the trust.

(3) The adjustment or determination would reduce an amount that is permanently set aside for a charitable purpose under the terms of the trust, unless both income and principal are set aside for the charitable purpose.

(4) Possessing or exercising the power would cause a person to be treated as the owner of all or part of the trust for federal income tax purposes.

(5) Possessing or exercising the power would cause all or part of the value of the trust assets to be included in the gross estate of an individual for federal
 estate tax purposes.

(6) Possessing or exercising the power would cause an individual to be treated as making a gift for federal gift tax purposes.

(7) The fiduciary is not an independent person.

(8) The trust is irrevocable and provides for income to be paid to the settlor and possessing or exercising the power would cause the adjusted principal or income to be considered an available resource or available income under a public benefit program.

(9) The trust is a unitrust under Article 3.

(f) If paragraph (4), (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (e) applies to a fiduciary:

(1) A cofiduciary to which paragraph (4), (5), (6), or
 (7) of subdivision (e) does not apply may exercise the power to adjust, unless the exercise of the power by the remaining cofiduciary or cofiduciaries is not permitted by the terms of the trust or law other than this chapter.

(2) If there is no cofiduciary to which paragraph (4), (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (e) does not apply, the fiduciary may appoint a cofiduciary to which paragraph (4), (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (e) does not apply, which may be a special fiduciary with limited powers, and the appointed cofiduciary may exercise the power to adjust under subdivision (a), unless the appointment of a cofiduciary or the exercise of the power by a cofiduciary is not permitted by the terms of the trust or law other than this chapter.

(g) A fiduciary may release or delegate to a cofiduciary the power to adjust under subdivision (a) if the fiduciary determines that the
 fiduciary’s possession or exercise of the power will or may do either of the following:

(1) Cause a result described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, or (8) of subdivision (e).

(2) Deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (e).

(h) A fiduciary’s release or delegation to a cofiduciary under subdivision (g) of the power to adjust pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Shall be in a record.

(2) Applies to the entire power, unless the release or delegation provides a limitation, which may be a limitation to the power to make any of the following adjustments:

(A) From income to principal.

(B) From principal to income.

(C) For specified property.

(D) In specified circumstances.

(3) For a delegation, may be modified by a redelegation under this subdivision by the cofiduciary to which the delegation is made.

(4) Subject to paragraph (3), is permanent, unless the release or delegation provides a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual or the lives of more than one individual.

(i) Terms of a trust that deny or limit the power to adjust between income and principal do not affect the application
 of this section, unless the terms of the trust expressly deny or limit the power to adjust under subdivision (a).

(j) The exercise of the power to adjust under subdivision (a) in any accounting period may apply to the current period, the immediately preceding period, and one or more subsequent periods.

(k) A description of the exercise of the power to adjust under subdivision (a) shall be either of the following:

(1) Included in a report, if any, sent to beneficiaries.

(2) Communicated at least annually to all beneficiaries that receive or are entitled to receive income from the trust or would be entitled to receive a distribution of principal if the trust were terminated at the time the notice is sent, assuming no power of appointment is
 exercised.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Unitrust [16330. - 16338.]

16330.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this article:

(a) “Applicable value” means the amount of the net fair market value of a trust taken into account under Section 16336.

(b) “Express unitrust” means a trust for which, under the terms of the trust without regard to this article, income or net income shall or may be calculated as a unitrust amount.

(c) “Income trust” means a trust that is not a unitrust.

(d) “Net fair market value of a trust” means the fair market value of the assets of the trust, less the noncontingent liabilities of the trust.

(e) “Unitrust” means a trust for which net income is a unitrust amount. The term includes an express unitrust.

(f) “Unitrust amount” means an amount computed by multiplying a determined value of a trust by a determined percentage. For a unitrust administered under a unitrust plan, the term means the applicable value, multiplied by the unitrust rate.

(g) “Unitrust plan” means a plan described in Sections 16334 to 16338, inclusive, and adopted pursuant to Section 16332.

(h) “Unitrust rate” means the rate used to compute the unitrust amount under subdivision (f) for a unitrust administered under a unitrust plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16331.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article applies to both of the following:

(1) An income trust, unless the terms of the trust expressly prohibit use of this article by a specific reference to this article or an explicit expression of intent that net income not be calculated as a unitrust amount.

(2) An express unitrust, except to the extent the terms of the trust explicitly do any of the following:

(A) Prohibit use of this article by a specific reference to this article.

(B) Prohibit conversion to an income trust.

(C) Limit changes to the method of calculating the unitrust amount.

(b) This article does not apply to a trust described in Section 170(f)(2)(B), 642(c)(5), 664(d), 2702(a)(3)(A)(ii) or (iii), or 2702(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Secs. 170(f)(2)(B), 642(c)(5), 664(d), 2702(a)(3)(A)(ii) or (iii), or 2702(b)).

(c) An income trust to which this article applies under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may be converted to a unitrust under this article regardless of the terms of the trust concerning distributions. Conversion to a unitrust under this article does not affect other terms of the trust concerning distributions of income or principal.

(d) This article applies to an estate only to the extent a trust is a beneficiary of the estate.
 To the extent of the trust’s interest in the estate, the estate may be administered as a unitrust, the administration of the estate as a unitrust may be discontinued, or the percentage or method used to calculate the unitrust amount may be changed, in the same manner as for a trust under this article.

(e) This article does not create a duty to take or consider action under this article or to inform a beneficiary about the applicability of this article.

(f) A fiduciary that in good faith takes or fails to take an action under this article is not liable to a person affected by the action or inaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16332.

(a) A fiduciary, without court approval, by complying with subdivisions (b) and (f), may do any of the following:

(1) Convert an income trust to a unitrust if the fiduciary creates in a record a unitrust plan for the trust providing for both of the following:

(A) That in administering the trust, the net income of the trust will be a unitrust amount rather than net income determined without regard to this article.

(B) The percentage and method used to calculate the unitrust amount.

(2) Change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount
 for a unitrust if the fiduciary implements in a record a unitrust plan or an amendment or replacement of a unitrust plan providing changes in the percentage or method used to calculate the unitrust amount.

(3) Convert a unitrust to an income trust if the fiduciary implements in a record a determination that, in administering the trust, the net income of the trust will be net income determined without regard to this article rather than a unitrust amount.

(b) A fiduciary may take an action under subdivision (a) if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The fiduciary determines that the action will assist the fiduciary to administer a trust impartially.

(2) The fiduciary sends a notice in a record, in the manner required by Section 16333, describing
 and proposing to take the action.

(3) No beneficiary objects to the proposed action in a writing delivered to the trustee within the period prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 16502.

(c) If a fiduciary receives, on or before the date stated in the notice under Section 16333, an objection in a record to a proposed action, the fiduciary or a beneficiary may request the court to have the proposed action taken as proposed, taken with modifications, or prevented. A person described in subdivision (a) of Section 16333 may oppose the proposed action in the proceeding under this subdivision, whether or not the person previously consented or objected.

(d) If, after sending a notice under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), a fiduciary decides not to take the action proposed in the notice, the fiduciary shall notify in a
 record each person described in subdivision (a) of Section 16333 of the decision not to take the action and the reasons for the decision.

(e) If a beneficiary requests in a record that a fiduciary take an action described in subdivision (a) and the fiduciary declines to act or does not act within 90 days after receiving the request, the beneficiary may request the court to direct the fiduciary to take the action requested.

(f) In deciding whether and how to take an action authorized by subdivision (a), or whether and how to respond to a request by a beneficiary under subdivision (e), a fiduciary shall consider all factors relevant to the trust and the beneficiaries, including relevant factors in subdivision (e) of Section 16325.

(g) A fiduciary may release or delegate the power to convert an income trust to a
 unitrust under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), or convert a unitrust to an income trust under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), for a reason described in subdivision (g) of Section 16327 and in the manner described in subdivision (h) of Section 16327.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16333.

A notice required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16332 shall be sent as required by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500), including notice to a beneficiary who is a minor and to the minor’s guardian, if any, and shall include all of the following:

(a) The action proposed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16332.

(b) For a conversion of an income trust to a unitrust, a copy of the unitrust plan adopted under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332.

(c) For a change in the percentage or method used to calculate the unitrust amount, a copy of the unitrust plan or amendment or replacement of the
 unitrust plan adopted under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332.

(d) A statement that the person to which the notice is sent may object to the proposed action by stating in a record the basis for the objection and sending or delivering the record to the fiduciary.

(e) The date by which an objection under subdivision (d) shall be received by the fiduciary, which shall be at least 30 days after the date the notice is sent.

(f) The date on which the action is proposed to be taken and the date on which the action is proposed to take effect.

(g) The name and contact information of the fiduciary.

(h) The name and contact information of a person who may be contacted for additional
 information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16334.

(a) In administering a unitrust under this article, a fiduciary shall follow a unitrust plan adopted under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332, or amended or replaced under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16332.

(b) A unitrust plan shall provide all of the following:

(1) The unitrust rate or the method for determining the unitrust rate under Section 16335.

(2) The method for determining the applicable value under Section 16336.

(3) The rules described in Sections 16335 to 16338, inclusive, that apply in the
 administration of the unitrust, whether the rules are either of the following:

(A) Mandatory, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 16336 or subdivision (a) of Section 16337.

(B) Optional, as provided in Section 16335, subdivision (b) of Section 16336, subdivision (b) of Section 16337, and subdivision (a) of Section 16338, to the extent the fiduciary elects to adopt those rules.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16335.

(a) A unitrust rate may not be less than 3 percent, or greater than 5 percent, unless the unitrust plan has been approved by court order. If the unitrust plan has been approved by court order, any unitrust rate may be used. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision and in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16338, a unitrust rate may be either of the following:

(1) A fixed unitrust interest rate.

(2) A unitrust rate that is determined for each period, using either of the following:

(A) A market index or other published data.

(B) A
 mathematical blend of market indices or other published data over a stated number of preceding periods.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a) of Section 16335 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16338, a unitrust plan may provide any of the following:

(1) A limit on how high the unitrust rate determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may rise.

(2) A limit on how low the unitrust rate determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may fall.

(3) A limit on how much the unitrust rate determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may increase over the unitrust rate for the preceding period or a mathematical blend of unitrust rates over a stated number of preceding periods.

(4) A limit on how much the unitrust rate determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may decrease below the unitrust rate for the preceding period or a mathematical blend of unitrust rates over a stated number of preceding periods.

(5) A mathematical blend of any of the unitrust rates determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of this subdivision.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16336.

(a) A unitrust plan shall provide the method for determining the fair market value of an asset for the purpose of determining the unitrust amount, including both of the following:

(1) The frequency of valuing the asset, which need not require a valuation in every period.

(2) The date for valuing the asset in each period in which the asset is valued.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16338, a unitrust plan may provide methods for determining the amount of the net fair market value of the trust to take into account in determining the applicable value, including all of the
 following:

(1) Obtaining an appraisal of an asset for which fair market value is not readily ascertainable.

(2) Exclusion of specific assets or groups or types of assets.

(3) Exceptions or modifications of the treatment of specific assets or groups or types of assets.

(4) Identification and treatment of money or property held for distribution.

(5) Use of either of the following:

(A) An average of fair market values over a stated number of preceding periods.

(B) Another mathematical blend of fair market values over a stated number of preceding periods.

(6) A limit on how much the applicable value of all assets, groups of assets, or individual assets may increase over either of the following:

(A) The corresponding applicable value for the preceding period.

(B) A mathematical blend of applicable values over a stated number of preceding periods.

(7) A limit on how much the applicable value of all assets, groups of assets, or individual assets may decrease below:

(A) The corresponding applicable value for the preceding period.

(B) A mathematical blend of applicable values over a stated number of preceding periods.

(8) The treatment of accrued income and other features of an asset that affect value.

(9) Determining the liabilities of the trust, including treatment of liabilities to conform to the treatment of assets under paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16337.

(a) A unitrust plan shall provide the period used under Sections 16335 and 16336. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16338, the period may be any of the following:

(1) A calendar year.

(2) A 12-month period other than a calendar year.

(3) A calendar quarter.

(4) A three-month period other than a calendar quarter.

(5) Another period.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 16338,
 a unitrust plan may provide standards for any of the following:

(1) Using fewer preceding periods under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (b) of, Section 16335 if any of the following circumstances exists:

(A) The trust was not in existence in a preceding period.

(B) Market indices or other published data are not available for a preceding period.

(2) Using fewer preceding periods under subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (5) of, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of, or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of, Section 16366, under either of the following circumstances:

(A) The trust was not in existence in a
 preceding period.

(B) Fair market values are not available for a preceding period.

(3) Prorating the unitrust amount on a daily basis for a part of a period in which the trust or the administration of the trust as a unitrust or the interest of any beneficiary commences or terminates.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16338.

(a) A unitrust plan may include any of the following:

(1) Provide methods and standards for all of the following:

(A) Determining the timing of distributions.

(B) Making distributions in money or in kind or partly in money and partly in kind.

(C) Correcting an underpayment or overpayment to a beneficiary based on the unitrust amount if there is an error in calculating the unitrust amount.

(2) Specify sources and the order of sources, including categories of income for federal income tax
 purposes, from which distributions of a unitrust amount are paid.

(3) Provide other standards and rules the fiduciary determines serve the interests of the beneficiaries.

(b) If a trust qualifies for a special tax benefit or a fiduciary is not an independent person:

(1) The unitrust rate established under Section 16335 may not be less than 3 percent or more than 5 percent.

(2) The only provisions of Section 16336 that apply are subdivision (a) and paragraphs (1), (4), and (9) of, and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of, subdivision (b) of that section.

(3) The only period that may be used under Section 16337 is a calendar year under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16337.

(4) The only other provisions of Section 16337 that apply are subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of, and paragraph (3) of, subdivision (b) of that section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Allocation of Receipts [16340. - 16355.]

16340.

(a) The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Capital distribution” means an entity distribution of money that is either of the following:

(A) A return of capital.

(B) A distribution in total or partial liquidation of the entity.

(2) “Entity” means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, regulated investment company, real estate investment trust, common trust fund, or any other organization or arrangement in which a person owns or holds an interest, whether or not the entity is a taxpayer for federal income tax
 purposes. “Entity” does not include any of the following:

(A) A trust or estate to which Section 16341 applies.

(B) A business or other activity to which Section 16342 applies that is not conducted by an entity described in subparagraph (A).

(C) An asset-backed security.

(D) An instrument or arrangement to which Section 16355 applies.

(3) “Entity distribution” means a payment or transfer by an entity made to a person in the person’s capacity as an owner or holder of an interest in the entity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an attribute or action of an entity includes an attribute or action of any other entity in which the
 entity owns or holds an interest, including an interest owned or held indirectly through another entity.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (d), a fiduciary shall allocate money received in an entity distribution to income.

(d) A fiduciary shall allocate to principal all of the following:

(1) Property received in an entity distribution that is not money.

(2) Money received in an entity distribution in an exchange for part or all of the fiduciary’s interest in the entity, to the extent the entity distribution reduces the fiduciary’s interest in the entity relative to the interests of other persons that own or hold interests in the entity.

(3) Money received in an entity distribution that the fiduciary determines or estimates is a capital distribution.

(4) Money received in an entity distribution from an entity that is a regulated investment company or real estate investment trust if the money received is a capital gain dividend for federal income tax purposes.

(5) Money received in an entity distribution that is treated, for federal income purposes, comparably to the treatment described in paragraph (4).

(e) A fiduciary may determine or estimate that money received in an entity distribution is a capital distribution in any of the following ways:

(1) By relying without inquiry or investigation on a characterization of the entity distribution provided by or on behalf of the
 entity, except under either of the following circumstances:

(A) The fiduciary determines, on the basis of information known to the fiduciary, that the characterization is or may be incorrect.

(B) The fiduciary owns or holds more than 50 percent of the voting interest in the entity.

(2) By determining or estimating, on the basis of information known to the fiduciary or provided to the fiduciary by or on behalf of the entity, that the total amount of money and property received by the fiduciary in the entity distribution or a series of related entity distributions is, or will be, greater than 20 percent of the fair market value of the fiduciary’s interest in the entity.

(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor (2) applies, by considering the factors in
 subdivision (f) and the information known to the fiduciary or provided to the fiduciary by, or on behalf of, the entity.

(f) In making a determination or estimate under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e), a fiduciary may consider the following:

(1) A characterization of an entity distribution provided by or on behalf of the entity.

(2) The amount of money or property received in either of the following:

(A) The entity distribution.

(B) What the fiduciary determines is, or will be, a series of related entity distributions.

(3) The amount described in paragraph (2) compared to the amount the fiduciary determines or estimates is,
 during the current or preceding accounting periods, either of the following:

(A) The entity’s operating income.

(B) The proceeds of the entity’s sale or other disposition of any of the following:

(i) All or part of the business or other activity conducted by the entity.

(ii) One or more business assets that are not sold to customers in the ordinary course of the business or other activity conducted by the entity.

(iii) One or more assets other than business assets, unless the entity’s primary activity is to invest in assets to realize gain on the disposition of all or some of the assets.

(C) If the entity’s primary activity
 is to invest in assets to realize gain on the disposition of all or some of the assets, the gain realized on the disposition.

(D) The entity’s regular, periodic entity distributions.

(E) The amount of money the entity has accumulated.

(F) The amount of money the entity has borrowed.

(G) The amount of money the entity has received from the sources described in Sections 16346, 16349, 16350, and 16351.

(H) The amount of money the entity has received from a source not otherwise described in this paragraph.

(4) Any other factor the fiduciary determines is relevant.

(g) If, after applying subdivisions (c) to (f), inclusive, a fiduciary determines that a part of an entity distribution is a capital distribution but is in doubt about the amount of the entity distribution that is a capital distribution, the fiduciary shall allocate to principal the amount of the entity distribution that is in doubt.

(h) If a fiduciary receives additional information about the application of this section to an entity distribution before the fiduciary has paid part or all of the entity distribution to a beneficiary, the fiduciary may consider the additional information before making the payment to the beneficiary and may change a decision to make the payment to the beneficiary.

(i) If a fiduciary receives additional information about the application of this section to an entity distribution after the fiduciary has paid part or all of the entity
 distribution to a beneficiary, the fiduciary has no duty to change or recover the payment to the beneficiary but may consider that information in determining whether to exercise the power to adjust under Section 16327.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16341.

A fiduciary shall allocate to income an amount received as a distribution of income, including a unitrust distribution under Article 3 (commencing with Section 16330), from a trust or estate in which the fiduciary has an interest, other than an interest the fiduciary purchased in a trust that is an investment entity, and shall allocate to principal an amount received as a distribution of principal from the trust or estate. If a fiduciary purchases, or receives from a settlor, an interest in a trust that is an investment entity, Section 16340, 16354, or 16355 applies to a receipt from the trust.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16342.

(a) This section applies to a business or other activity conducted by a fiduciary if the fiduciary determines that it is in the interests of the beneficiaries to account separately for the business or other activity instead of doing either of the following:

(1) Accounting for the business or other activity as part of the fiduciary’s general accounting records.

(2) Conducting the business or other activity through an entity described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16340.

(b) A fiduciary may account separately under this section for the transactions of a business or other activity,
 whether or not assets of the business or other activity are segregated from other assets held by the fiduciary.

(c) A fiduciary that accounts separately under this section for a business or other activity:

(1) May determine the extent to which the net money receipts of the business or other activity shall be retained for any of the following purposes:

(A) Working capital.

(B) The acquisition or replacement of fixed assets.

(C) Other reasonably foreseeable needs of the business or other activity.

(2) May determine the extent to which the remaining net money receipts are accounted for as principal or income in the fiduciary’s
 general accounting records for the trust.

(3) May make a determination under paragraph (1) separately and differently from the fiduciary’s decisions concerning distributions of income or principal.

(4) Shall account for the net amount received from the sale of an asset of the business or other activity, other than a sale in the ordinary course of the business or other activity, as principal in the fiduciary’s general accounting records for the trust, to the extent the fiduciary determines that the net amount received is no longer required in the conduct of the business or other activity.

(d) Activities for which a fiduciary may account separately under this section include all of the following:

(1) Retail, manufacturing, service, and other traditional
 business activities.

(2) Farming.

(3) Raising and selling livestock and other animals.

(4) Managing rental properties.

(5) Extracting minerals, water, and other natural resources.

(6) Growing and cutting timber.

(7) An activity to which Section 16353, 16354, or 16355 applies.

(8) Any other business conducted by the fiduciary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16343.

A fiduciary shall allocate to principal any of the following:

(a) To the extent not allocated to income under this chapter, an asset received from any of the following:

(1) An individual, during the individual’s lifetime.

(2) An estate.

(3) A trust, on termination of an income interest.

(4) A payor under a contract naming the fiduciary as beneficiary.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this article, money or other property received from the
 sale, exchange, liquidation, or change in form of a principal asset.

(c) An amount recovered from a third party to reimburse the fiduciary because of a disbursement described in subdivision (a) of Section 16361, or for another reason to the extent not based on loss of income.

(d) Proceeds of property taken by eminent domain, except that proceeds awarded for loss of income in an accounting period are income if a current income beneficiary had a mandatory income interest during the period.

(e) Net income received in an accounting period during which there is no beneficiary to which a fiduciary may or shall distribute income.

(f) Other receipts as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 16330).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16344.

To the extent a fiduciary does not account for the management of rental property as a business under Section 16342, the fiduciary shall allocate to income an amount received as rent of real or personal property, including an amount received for cancellation or renewal of a lease. Both of the following apply to an amount received as a refundable deposit, including a security deposit or a deposit that is to be applied as rent for future periods:

(1) The amount shall be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease, except as otherwise provided by law other than this chapter.

(2) The amount is not allocated to income or available for distribution to a beneficiary until the fiduciary’s
 contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16345.

(a) This section does not apply to an obligation to which Section 16348, 16349, 16350, 16351, 16353, 16354, or 16355 applies.

(b) A fiduciary shall allocate to income, without provision for amortization of premium, an amount received as interest on an obligation to pay money to the fiduciary, including an amount received as consideration for prepaying principal.

(c) A fiduciary shall allocate to principal an amount received from the sale, redemption, or other disposition of an obligation to pay money to the fiduciary. A fiduciary shall allocate to income the increment in value of a bond or other obligation for the payment of money bearing no stated interest but payable or
 redeemable, at maturity or another future time, in an amount that exceeds the amount in consideration of which it was issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16346.

(a) This section does not apply to a contract to which Section 16348 applies.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), a fiduciary shall allocate to principal the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract received by the fiduciary as beneficiary, including a contract that insures against damage to, destruction of, or loss of title to an asset. The fiduciary shall allocate dividends on an insurance policy to income to the extent premiums on the policy are paid from income and to principal to the extent premiums on the policy are paid from principal.

(c) A fiduciary shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures the fiduciary against loss of
 any of the following:

(1) Occupancy or other use by a current income beneficiary.

(2) Income.

(3) Subject to Section 16342, profits from a business.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16347.
